California, session 20252026, SB251.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. (a) The sum of one million two hundred twenty-one thousand four hundred ninety-one dollars and thirty cents ($1,221,491.30) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the Attorney General to be allocated in accordance with the following schedule:(1) The sum of six hundred seventeen thousand two hundred seventy-seven dollars and eighty-one cents ($617,277.81) for the payment of claims, settlements, or judgments against the state arising from First Amendment Coalition v. Bonta (San Francisco Superior Court Case No. CFP-19-516545).(2) The sum of two hundred forty-four thousand three hundred ninety-nine dollars and seventy-six cents ($244,399.76) for the payment of claims, settlements, or judgments against the state arising from Linton v. Bonta (United States District Court, Northern District of California, No. 3:18-cv-07653-JD).(3) The sum of three hundred fifty-nine thousand eight hundred thirteen dollars and seventy-three cents ($359,813.73) for the payment of claims, settlements, or judgments against the state arising from X Corp. v. Bonta (United States District Court, Eastern District of California, No. 2:23-cv-01939-WBS-AC).(b) Any funds appropriated in excess of the amounts actually required for the payment of these claims, settlements, or judgments shall revert to the General Fund within 45 days after final payment is made. SEC. 2. This act is an urgency statute necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect. The facts constituting the necessity are:In order to pay judgment and settlement claims against the state and end hardship to claimants as quickly as possible, it is necessary for this act to take effect immediately.